Utah statutes.
48-2e-902.   Registration to do business in this state.

(1)  A foreign limited partnership may not do business in this state until it registers with the division under this part.

(2)  A foreign limited partnership doing business in this state may not maintain an action or proceeding in this state unless it is registered to do business in this state.

(3)  The failure of a foreign limited partnership to register to do business in this state does not impair the validity of a contract or act of the foreign limited partnership or preclude it from defending an action or proceeding in this state.

(4)  A limitation on the liability of a general partner or limited partners of a foreign limited partnership is not waived solely because the foreign limited partnership does business in this state without registering to do business in this state.

(5)  Subsections 48-2e-901(1) and (2) apply even if the foreign limited partnership fails to register under this part.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

